California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The funding for the advance shall be provided from amounts deposited into the bank account established by the Administrative Office of the Courts under subdivision (b) of Section 68085.1 of the Government Code. The advance shall be returned within 30 days if a law library ceases to operate or the responsibility for the law library is transferred from the law library board of trustees.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 9.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.1.

(a) (1) Until the end of the moratorium described in Section 70601 of the Government Code, the board of supervisors of any county may increase, as provided in this section, the amount distributed to its county law library fund from the uniform filing fees listed in Section 6321 whenever it determines that the increase is necessary to defray the expenses of the law library.

(2) Any increase in the amount distributed to the law library fund in any county under this subdivision shall not be effective until January 1 of the next year after the adoption by the board of supervisors of the increase. The amount of the increase in any calendar year shall be no greater than three dollars ($3) over the previous calendar year. A copy of the action of the board of supervisors that establishes the increase shall be provided to the Administrative Office of the Courts as soon as it becomes available but no later than December 15 of the year before the increased distribution goes into effect.

(b) Distribution changes after January 1, 2008, shall be determined by the process described in Section 70601 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) In an action or proceeding in which a claim for money damages falls within
 the monetary jurisdiction of the small claims court and is filed by an assignee who is prohibited from filing or maintaining a claim pursuant to Section 116.420 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the uniform filing fee shall be reduced by twenty-four dollars ($24) to one hundred eighty-one dollars ($181) if the complaint contains a declaration under penalty of perjury, executed by the party requesting the reduction in fees, that the case qualifies for the lower fee because the claim for money damages will not exceed the monetary jurisdiction of small claims court and is filed by an assignee of the claim.

(2) When the uniform filing fee is reduced as provided under this subdivision, the amount distributed from each uniform filing fee to the law library fund in the county shall be as follows:
JurisdictionAmountAlameda$12.00Alpine1.00Amador6.00Butte12.00Calaveras7.00Colusa12.00Contra Costa8.00Del Norte6.00El Dorado9.00Fresno9.00Glenn6.00Humboldt12.00Imperial12.00Inyo6.00Kern12.00Kings12.00Lake12.00Lassen12.00Los Angeles5.00Madera12.00Marin12.00Mariposa4.00Mendocino12.00Merced12.00Modoc6.00Mono6.00Monterey10.00Napa12.00Nevada7.00Orange8.00Placer7.00Plumas6.00Riverside12.00Sacramento8.50San Benito6.00San Bernardino12.00San Diego12.00San Francisco12.00San Joaquin10.00San Luis Obispo12.00San Mateo12.00Santa Barbara12.00Santa Clara8.00Santa Cruz12.00Shasta8.50Sierra9.00Siskiyou8.00Solano9.00Sonoma12.00Stanislaus6.50Sutter1.00Tehama9.00Trinity6.00Tulare12.00Tuolumne2.00Ventura12.00Yolo10.00Yuba7.00The increases
 described in subdivision (a) do not apply to the law library distributions in this subdivision.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 68085.4 of the Government Code, when the uniform filing fee is reduced as provided in this subdivision, the amounts distributed to dispute resolution programs, the State Court Facilities Construction Fund, the Judges’ Retirement Fund, children’s waiting rooms, and the Equal Access Fund shall remain as provided under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 68085.4 of the Government Code and shall not be changed. Only the amounts distributed to the Trial Court Trust Fund, the law libraries, and the State Court Facilities Construction Fund shall be adjusted. The amount distributed from each uniform filing fee under this section to
 the State Court Facilities Construction Fund, established in Section
 70371 of the Government Code, shall be thirty-one dollars ($31). If the fee is further reduced below one hundred eighty-one dollars ($181), as with a partial waiver or partial payment, the proportional reductions described in subdivision (g) of Section 68085.1 of the Government Code shall apply.

(d) Distributions under this section to the law library fund in each county shall be used only for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

(e) As used in this section and Section 6321, “law library fund” includes a law library account described in the second paragraph of Section 6320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (AB 143)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6324.

The board of supervisors may appropriate from the county treasury for law library purposes such sums as may in their discretion appear proper. When so paid into the law library fund, those sums shall constitute a part of the fund and be used for the same purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 12.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

6325.

The orders and demands of the trustees of the law library, when duly made and authenticated as hereinafter provided, shall be verified and audited by the auditing officer, and paid by the treasurer of the county out of the law library fund. Full entry and record shall be kept as in other cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 13.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

6326.

A revolving fund of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) may be established from money in the law library fund, by resolution of the board of law library trustees, for expenditures of not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) each for purposes for which the law library fund may lawfully be expended. The board shall prescribe the procedure by which money may be drawn from the revolving fund, the records to be kept,
 and the manner in which reimbursements shall be made to the revolving fund by demand and order from the law library fund. All or any part of the money in the revolving fund may be deposited in a commercial account in a bank, subject to payments of not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) each by check on the signature of the secretary or any other person or persons designated by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Duties and Powers of Boards [6340. - 6350.]

6340.

Each board of law library trustees shall establish and maintain a law library at the county seat of the county in which it is appointed and may lease suitable quarters therefor or construct quarters pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and may provide leased or constructed quarters with suitable furniture and utility services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1076.)
-------------------------------------------

6341.

Any board of law library trustees may establish and maintain a branch of the law library in any city in the county, other than the county seat, in which a session of the superior court is held. In any city constituting the county seat, any board of law library trustees may establish and maintain a branch of the law library at any location therein where four or more judges of the superior court are designated to hold sessions more than 10 miles distant from the principal office of the court. In any city and county any board of law library trustees may establish and maintain branches of the law library. A branch is in all respects a part of the law library and is governed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6342.

A board of law library trustees may order the drawing and payment, upon properly authenticated vouchers, of money from out of the law library fund, for any liability or expenditure herein authorized, and generally do all that may be necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.6.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6343.

A board may make and enforce all rules, regulations, and by-laws necessary for the administration, government, and protection of the law library, and of all property belonging thereto, or that may be loaned, devised, bequeathed, or donated to it. A board may make expenditures for the suitable maintenance, repair, protection and insurance against loss of such property, both real and personal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

6344.

A board may purchase books, journals, other publications, and other personal property. It may dispose of obsolete or duplicate books, and other unneeded or unusable property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

6345.

A board may appoint a law librarian and define the powers and prescribe the duties of any law library employees, determine the number, and elect all necessary subordinate law librarians and law library employees, and at its pleasure remove any law librarian or law library employees.

For the purpose of facilitating the recruitment of professional and technically trained persons to fill positions for which there is a shortage of qualified applicants, a board may authorize payment of all or a part of the reasonable travel expense of applicants who are called for interview and all or part of the reasonable travel and moving expense of persons who change their place of residence to accept employment with the law library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.7.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6346.

A board shall fix the salaries of the law librarian and law library employees, and may require a bond of any law librarian or law library employee, in such sum as it may fix. The premium on a bond given by an authorized surety company may be paid from the law library fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.8.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6346.5.

A board of law library trustees may contract with the California Public Employees’ Retirement System, to make all or any of the employees of the law library members of the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.9.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6346.6.

As an alternative to Section 6346.5, a board of law library trustees may, with the consent of the board of administration of the applicable retirement system, elect to make all or any of the officers or employees of the law library members of the retirement system which covers the officers and employees of the county in which the law library is established and to have the law library officers and employees deemed to be county employees for purposes of that retirement system. In the event of such an election, the employer contributions on behalf of the covered law library officers and employees shall be made from law library funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6347.

A board may contract with any other law library board, law library association, superior court, or legal-related entity, including a self-help group or other organization that provides a similar service, to provide public law library services as may best carry into effect the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.10.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.

A board may expend surplus funds under its control, not necessary for use to maintain the law library, to acquire or lease real property and erect thereon a library building to house the law library. In the alternative, a board of law library trustees may appropriate from the surplus funds so much as in the discretion of the board may be necessary to obtain adequate quarters for the law library in any building hereafter erected by the board of supervisors of the county in which the law library is maintained. The moneys so appropriated shall not be more than the proportion of the total cost of the building which the space allotted to the law library bears to the total usable space in the building. The moneys so appropriated may be transferred to the board of supervisors of the county for use in erecting the
 building, or may be paid directly on contracts for the erection thereof made by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.11.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.1.

An appropriation to obtain quarters for the law library in a building to be erected by the board of supervisors of the county, may be made subject to such terms and conditions, including approval of plans and specifications, and regarding maintenance and use of the quarters, as may be mutually agreed upon by the board of law library trustees and the board of supervisors.

Where a board of law library trustees determines to erect a library building to house the law library, the State of California or the county or the city in which the building is to be located, may set apart and dedicate or lease land owned by any of them for the permanent use of the building and access thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1069.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.2.

When a board of law library trustees in any county determines to erect a library building to house the law library, it may borrow money for that purpose and repay the loan from its future income. The board may borrow the money from any person, or private or public agency, or corporation, in an amount not exceeding half of the funds of the board allocated to the construction of the building, upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the board and the lender and approved by resolution of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1299, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.3.

A library building erected to house the law library may include courtrooms with offices in connection therewith, offices for use of a county bar association, and an office for a notary public and public stenographer, which courtrooms and offices the board of law library trustees may lease, the income to be deposited in the law library fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.12.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.4.

Real property acquired by a board may be sold, leased, rented, or licensed with the proceeds to be deposited in the law library fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   (SB 1462)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.5.

A board of law library trustees may invest surplus funds in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or of the average annual expenditures of the library for the four fiscal years immediately preceding the investment, whichever is lesser, in the Local Agency Investment Fund pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 16429.1) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code or bonds of the government of the United States or of this state. Bonds so purchased may be sold at any time in the discretion of the board. In computing average annual expenditures for the purposes of this section, capital expenditures for the purchase of real property and construction of a library building shall not be included.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.14.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.6.

A board of law library trustees may contract with the board of supervisors of the county upon such terms as may be mutually agreeable for the construction by the board of supervisors of a law library building or any part thereof or for quarters in a building to be erected by the board of supervisors. The agreement may be made subject to such terms and conditions including approval of plans and specifications, regarding the furnishing and equipping of the building or quarters, and regarding maintenance and use of the quarters, as may be mutually agreed upon by the board of law library trustees and the board of supervisors. The contract may provide that the board of law library trustees shall make payments to the board of supervisors out of future income in payment for constructing or furnishing or equipping the
 law library building or part thereof or those quarters in a building. Any contract executed by a board of law library trustees and a board of supervisors, which, if executed subsequent to the effective date of this section would be valid, is hereby ratified and validated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.15.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6348.7.

A board of law library trustees may enter into an agreement with a county for the joint exercise of powers pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code for the purpose of constructing a building or buildings to house the law library and court or county facilities, without limitation as to the number of courtrooms such building or buildings may contain, and may lease from any authority created pursuant to such agreement the space required for law library purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 31, Sec. 1.   Effective May 11, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

6349.

Each board of law library trustees, on or before the 15th day of October of each year, shall make an annual report to the board of supervisors of the county in which the law library is maintained, for the preceding fiscal year ending on the 30th day of June. A copy of the report shall be filed with the auditor of the county.

The report shall give the condition of their trust, with full statements of all their property and money received, whence derived, how used and expended, the number of books, periodicals and other publications on hand, the number added by purchase, gift, or otherwise during the year, the number lost or missing, and other information as might be of interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.16.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

6350.

A financial report, showing all receipts and disbursements of money, shall be made by the secretary, duly verified by oath, at the same time that the report of the board is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.17.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Provisions [6360. - 6363.]

6360.

(a) A law library established under this chapter shall be free to the judiciary, to state and county officials, to members of the State Bar of California, and to all residents of the county, for the examination of books and other publications at the library or its branches.

(b) The board of law library trustees may permit the removal of the books and other publications from the library and its branches as it considers proper, subject to those rules, and, in its discretion, the giving of security, as it may provide to ensure the safekeeping and prompt return thereof, but security shall not be required of members of the judiciary or county officials. The board may provide for the levying of fines and charges for violation of the rules, and may make charges for special
 services, such as the making of photocopies of pages of library books, electronic delivery, messenger and other delivery services, educational programs, special events, and provision of supplies or food services.

(c) The board of law library trustees may require persons other than members of the judiciary, county officials, and members of the bar resident in the county, to pay dues as the board may fix for the privilege of removing books and other publications from the library. With the approval of the board of supervisors, the board of law library trustees may charge individual members of the bar resident in the county fees for the removal of books and other publications from the library. These fees shall not exceed the cost of providing the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 10.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6361.

The board of supervisors of the county in which the law library is established shall provide sufficient quarters for the use of the library upon request of the board of law library trustees, except that the board of supervisors need not provide such quarters when the board of law library trustees determines it has sufficient funds, over and above those necessary for operation and maintenance expenses, to provide its own quarters. Such provision may include, with the room or rooms provided, suitable furniture, window shades, floor coverings, lighting, heat and telephone and janitor service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1076.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.5.

The State Librarian shall periodically supply to each law library established under the provisions of this chapter, and requesting the same, information regarding newly published materials to aid such libraries in their selection of new materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.

Whenever a law library, and a board of trustees to govern the same, is in existence under the provisions of any law, other than the law superseded by this chapter, in any county, or city and county, in this State, this chapter shall not be considered a repeal of any legislation under which such library was established and is now governed, but shall be deemed to confer upon such library the benefits of Sections 6321, 6322, 6322.1, 6326, 6341, 6345, 6346, 6346.5, and 6347.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1786.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Legal Document Assistants and Unlawful Detainer Assistants [6400. - 6415.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6400. - 6401.7.]

6400.

(a) “Unlawful detainer assistant” means any individual who for compensation renders assistance or advice in the prosecution or defense of an unlawful detainer claim or action, including any bankruptcy petition that may affect the unlawful detainer claim or action.

(b) “Unlawful detainer claim” means a proceeding, filing, or action affecting rights or liabilities of any person that arises under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1159) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure and that contemplates an adjudication by a court.

(c) “Legal document assistant” means:

(1) Any person who is not exempted under Section 6401 and who
 provides, or assists in providing, or offers to provide, or offers to assist in providing, for compensation, any self-help service to a member of the public who is representing themselves in a legal matter, or who holds themselves out as someone who offers that service or has that authority. This paragraph does not apply to any individual whose assistance consists merely of secretarial or receptionist services.

(2) A corporation, partnership, association, or other entity that employs or contracts with any person not exempted under Section 6401 who, as part of their responsibilities, provides, or assists in providing, or offers to provide, or offers to assist in providing, for compensation, any self-help service to a member of the public who is representing themselves in a legal matter or holds themselves out as someone who offers that service or has that authority. This paragraph does not apply to an individual whose assistance consists merely
 of secretarial or receptionist services.

(d) “Self-help service” means all of the following:

(1) Completing legal documents in a ministerial manner, selected by a person who is representing themselves in a legal matter, by typing or otherwise completing the documents at the person’s specific direction.

(2) Providing general published factual information that has been written or approved by an attorney, pertaining to legal procedures, rights, or obligations to a person who is representing themselves in a legal matter, to assist the person in representing themselves. This service, in and of itself, does not require registration as a legal document assistant.

(3) Making published legal documents available to a person who is representing themselves in a
 legal matter.

(4) Filing and serving legal forms and documents at the specific direction of a person who is representing themselves in a legal matter.

(e) “Compensation” means money, property, or anything else of value.

(f) A legal document assistant, including any legal document assistant employed by a partnership or corporation, shall not provide any self-help service for compensation, unless the legal document assistant is registered pursuant to Section 6402.

(g) A legal document assistant may not provide any kind of advice, explanation, opinion, or recommendation to a consumer about possible legal rights, remedies, defenses, options, selection of forms, or strategies. A legal document assistant shall complete documents only in the manner prescribed
 by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 8.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

This chapter does not apply to any person engaged in any of the following occupations, provided that the person does not also perform the duties of a legal document assistant in addition to those occupations:

(a) Any government employee who is acting in the course of their employment.

(b) A licensee
 of the State Bar of California, or
 their employee, paralegal, or agent, or an independent contractor while acting on behalf of a licensee of the State Bar.

(c) Any employee of a nonprofit, tax-exempt corporation who either assists clients free of charge or is supervised by a licensee of the State Bar of California who has malpractice insurance.

(d) A licensed real estate broker or licensed real estate salesperson, as defined in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10130) of Part 1 of
 Division 4, who acts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10131 on an unlawful detainer claim as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6400, and who is a party to the unlawful detainer action.

(e) An immigration consultant, as defined in Chapter 19.5 (commencing with Section 22440) of Division 8.

(f) A person registered as a process server under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 or a person registered as a professional photocopier under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 22450) of Division 8.

(g) A person who provides services relative to the preparation of security instruments or conveyance documents as an integral part of the provision of title or escrow service.

(h) A person who provides services that are regulated by federal law.

(i) A person who is employed by, and provides services to, a supervised financial institution, holding company, subsidiary, or affiliate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.5.

This chapter does not sanction, authorize, or encourage the practice of law by nonlawyers. Registration under this chapter, or an exemption from registration, does not immunize any person from prosecution or liability pursuant to Section 6125, 6126, 6126.5, or 6127.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.6.

A legal document assistant may not provide service to a client who requires assistance that exceeds the definition of self-help service in subdivision (d) of Section 6400, and shall inform the client that the client requires the services of an attorney.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.7.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 5.5, comprising Sections 6400 to 6415.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration Procedures [6402. - 6407.]

6402.

A legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall be registered pursuant to this chapter by the county clerk in the county in which their principal place of business is located, and in which they maintain a branch office, and provide proof that the registrant has satisfied the bonding requirement of Section 6405. No person who has been disbarred or suspended from the practice of law pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with
 Section 6100) of Chapter 4 may, during the period of any disbarment or suspension, register as a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant. The Department of Consumer Affairs shall develop the application required to be completed by a person for purposes of registration as a legal document assistant. The application shall specify the types of proof that the applicant shall provide to the county clerk in order to demonstrate the qualifications and requirements of Section 6402.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 4.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.1.

To be eligible to apply for registration under this chapter as a legal document assistant, the applicant shall possess at least one of the following:

(a) A high school diploma or general equivalency diploma, and either a minimum of two years of law-related experience under the supervision of a licensed attorney, or a minimum of two years experience, prior to January 1, 1999, providing self-help service.

(b) A baccalaureate degree in any field and either a minimum of one year of law-related experience under the supervision of a licensed attorney, or a minimum of one year of experience, prior to January 1, 1999, providing self-help service.

(c) A certificate of completion from a paralegal program that is institutionally accredited but not approved by the American Bar Association, that requires successful completion of a minimum of 24 semester units, or the equivalent, in legal specialization courses.

(d) A certificate of completion from a paralegal program approved by the American Bar Association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.2.

To be eligible to renew registration under this chapter, the registrant shall complete 15 hours of continuing legal education courses, which meet the requirements of Section 6070, during the two-year period preceding renewal. A registrant is not required to complete legal ethics education as part of the required 15 hours of continuing legal education courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 776, Sec. 2.   (AB 3250)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

(a) The application for registration of a natural person shall contain all of the following statements about the applicant:

(1) Name, age, address, and telephone number.

(2) Whether the applicant has been convicted of a felony, or of a misdemeanor under Section 6126 or 6127, or found liable under Section 6126.5.

(3) Whether
 the applicant has been held liable in a civil action by final judgment or entry of a stipulated judgment, if the action alleged fraud, the use of an untrue or misleading representation, or the use of an unfair, unlawful, or deceptive business practice.

(4) Whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of this chapter.

(5) Whether the applicant has had a civil judgment entered against
 them in an action arising out of the applicant’s negligent, reckless, or willful failure to properly perform their obligation as a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant.

(6) Whether the applicant has had a registration revoked pursuant to Section 6413.

(7) If the application is for a renewal of registration, a statement by the applicant that
 they have
 completed the legal education courses required by Section 6402.2.

(b) The application for registration of a natural person shall be accompanied by the display of personal identification, such as a California driver’s license, birth certificate, or other identification acceptable to the county clerk to adequately determine the identity of the applicant.

(c) The application for registration of a partnership or corporation shall contain all of the following statements about the applicant:

(1) The names, ages, addresses, and telephone numbers of the general partners or officers.

(2) Whether the general partners or officers have ever been convicted of a felony, or a misdemeanor under Section 6126 or 6127, or found liable under Section
 6126.5.

(3) Whether the general partners or officers have ever been held liable in a civil action by final judgment or entry of a stipulated judgment, if the action alleged fraud, the use of an untrue or misleading representation, or the use of an unfair, unlawful, or deceptive business practice.

(4) Whether the general partners or officers have ever been convicted of a misdemeanor violation of this chapter.

(5) Whether the general partners or officers have had a civil judgment entered against them in an action arising out of a negligent, reckless, or willful failure to properly perform the obligations of a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant.

(6) Whether the general partners or officers have ever had a registration revoked pursuant
 to Section 6413.

(7) If the application is for a renewal of registration, a statement by the applicant that the individuals performing legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant services have completed the legal education courses required by Section 6402.2.

(d) The applications made under this section shall be made under penalty of perjury.

(e) The county clerk shall retain the application for registration for a period of three years following the expiration date of the application, after which time the application may be destroyed if it is scanned or if the conditions specified in Section 26205.1 of the Government Code are met. If the application is scanned, the scanned image shall be retained for a period of 10 years, after which time that image may be destroyed and, notwithstanding Section 26205.1 of
 the Government Code, no reproduction thereof need be made or preserved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 5.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

An applicant shall pay a fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) to the county clerk at the time the applicant files an application for initial registration or renewal of registration. An additional fee of ten dollars ($10) shall be paid to the county clerk for each additional identification card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 6.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

(a) (1) An application for a certificate of registration by an individual shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter. The total aggregate liability on the bond shall be limited to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(2) An application for a certificate of registration by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond executed by a corporate surety qualified to do business in this state and conditioned upon compliance with this chapter in the following amount, based on the total number of legal
 document assistants and unlawful detainer assistants employed by the partnership or corporation:

(A) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for one to four assistants.

(B) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for five to nine assistants.

(C) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for 10 or more assistants. An application for a certificate of registration by a person employed by a partnership or corporation shall be accompanied by a bond of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) only if the partnership or corporation has not posted a bond in the amount required by this subdivision.

(3) If a partnership or corporation increases the number of assistants it employs above the number stated in its application for a certificate of registration, the partnership or
 corporation shall promptly increase the bond to the applicable amount in subparagraphs (B) or (C) of paragraph (2) based on the actual number of assistants it employs, and shall promptly submit the increased bond to the county clerk.

(4) The bond may be terminated pursuant to Section 995.440 of, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 996.310) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of, the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The county clerk shall, upon filing of the bond, deliver the bond forthwith to the county recorder for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code shall be paid by the registrant. The fee may be paid to the county clerk who shall transmit it to the recorder.

(c) The fee for filing, canceling, revoking, or withdrawing the bond is seven dollars ($7).

(d) The county recorder shall record the bond and any notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond, and shall thereafter mail the instrument, unless specified to the contrary, to the person named in the instrument and, if no person is named, to the party leaving it for recording. The recording fee specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code for notice of cancellation, revocation, or withdrawal of the bond shall be paid to the county clerk, who shall transmit it to the county recorder.

(e) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a), a registrant may deposit the amount required by subdivision (a) in cash with the county clerk.

(f) If the certificate is revoked, the bond or cash deposit shall be returned to the bonding party or depositor subject to subdivision (g) and the right of a person to
 recover against the bond or cash deposit under Section 6412.
